trunk/incubator/apertium-es-an.an.dix
    <pardef n="/o__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aragon/és__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>és</l>
          <r>és<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eses</l>
          <r>és<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esa</l>
          <r>és<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ésas</l>
          <r>és<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="luenga__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
</pardefs>

  <e lm="aragonés"><i>aragon</i><par n="aragon/és__adj"/></e>
  <e lm="luenga"><i>luenga</i><par n="luenga__n"/></e>
  <e lm="augua"><i>augua</i><par n="luenga__n"/></e>
